Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1624
Employee benefit plans; continuation of coverage; compliance with other laws; school district covered employees; rights.

(1) Employee benefit plans established pursuant to the Political Subdivisions Self-Funding Benefits Act shall comply with sections 44-1640 to 44-1645 relating to continuation of coverage if subject to such sections.

(2) If any covered employee of a plan sponsor which is a school district terminates employment with such plan sponsor and obtains employment with another plan sponsor which is a school district prior to October 1, 1994, such employee or such employee and any dependents shall not be subject to any preexisting condition period or other waiting period of the employee benefit plan of the plan sponsor with which such employment is obtained if both such plan sponsors have obtained excess insurance from the same insurer.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 24.